New York, session 2025-2026, A7557.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 804-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 804-e. Health education; menstrual disorders. The commissioner may 4 promulgate rules and regulations for a health education curriculum to 5 include instruction regarding menstrual disorders, including but not 6 limited to, endometriosis. The contents of such curriculum may include 7 information regarding the timing, signs and symptoms of endometriosis 8 and other menstrual disorders; the importance of menstrual health and 9 its impacts on one's physical, emotional, social, and academic life; 10 basic statistics on endometriosis and other menstrual disorders; best 11 practices on how to be one's own healthcare advocate; basic treatment 12 options for endometriosis and other menstrual disorders; and other 13 information deemed necessary by the commissioner. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 15 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10685-01-5